New Jersey, session 222, S1174.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill): Board means the Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. Budget billing plan means a public utility service payment plan that allows a customer to pay a predetermined monthly rate for a set time period, based on the customer's average usage. Customer means a residential customer receiving service from a public utility and participating in a budget billing plan offered by the public utility, as provided by any board rule, regulation, or order. Major emergency event means a natural or humanly caused occurrence arising from conditions beyond the control of the public utility, including but not limited to, a thunderstorm, earthquake, tornado, hurricane, flood, heat wave, snowstorm, or ice storm, which results in: a.     a sustained service interruption to at least five percent of the customers within an operating area or at least five percent of the utilitys customers within a municipality or county located in an operating area; or b.    the declaration of a state of emergency or disaster by the State or by the federal government. Operating area means a defined geographical service territory where a public utility distributes electricity or natural gas, or both, to end users as approved by the board. "Public utility" means a public utility as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity or natural gas, or both, to end users within this State. Service interruption means the cessation of electric or natural gas service by one or more customers of a public utility. 2.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, the board shall prohibit a public utility from charging a customer for service by that public utility during any time the customer incurred a service interruption due to the customer having sustained damage to the customers residence from the effects of a major emergency event and until such time as service is restored; provided, however, that the board may allow a public utility to collect payment from a customer after the billing due date, pursuant to law, if the customer owes the public utility any charge for service rendered prior to the date of a major emergency event. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.